Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.150

Facilitating recovery from Mt. St. Helens eruption—Scope of local government action.

All entities of local government and agencies thereof are authorized to take action as follows to facilitate recovery from the devastation of the eruption of Mt. St. Helens:

(1) Cooperate with the state, state agencies, and the United States Army Corps of Engineers and other agencies of the federal government in planning dredge site selection and dredge spoils removal;

(2) Counties and cities may re-zone areas and sites as necessary to facilitate recovery operations;

(3) Counties may manage and maintain lands involved and the deposited dredge spoils; and

(4) Local governments may assist the Army Corps of Engineers in the dredging and dredge spoils deposit operations.

[ 1982 c 7 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 7: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 7 s 11.]

Facilitating recovery from Mt. St. Helens eruption—Legislative findings—Purpose: RCW 43.01.200.

Scope of state agency action: RCW 43.01.210.